Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8509.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, Joseph
Couto may join Brandon Kemmy and Jacqueline Manousos in marriage within the Town of
Tiverton, Rhode Island on or about August 2, 2026. Joseph Couto is hereby authorized and
empowered to join the foregoing persons in marriage pursuant to and in accordance with Chapter
3 of Title 15 of the General laws, entitled "Solemnization of Marriages."
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006412
========